Nevada, session 83, SB148.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 482 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States who
was assigned to a unit that was awarded the Presidential Unit
Citation at the time of the action for which the Presidential Unit
Citation was awarded is entitled to specially designed license
plates which indicate that the veteran has served on a unit that
was awarded the Presidential Unit Citation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Department shall design, prepare and issue such license plates
using any colors and designs which the Department deems
appropriate. The Department shall create a unique license plate
design for each branch of the Armed Forces of the United States,
which must be based on the design of the service ribbon
representing the Presidential Unit Citation within that branch,
except that the Department may utilize the same design for
branches of the Armed Forces of the United States which award
service ribbons of the same design.
3. A person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant
to this section, has suffered a qualifying service-connected
disability as a result of his or her service in the Armed Forces of
the United States and receives compensation from the United
States for the disability is entitled to have his or her special license
plates issued pursuant to this section inscribed with the
international symbol of access, which must comply with the
applicable federal standards and must be white on a blue
background.
4. Each person who qualifies for special license plates
pursuant to this section may apply for not more than two sets of
plates. If the person applies for a second set of plates for an
additional vehicle, the second set of plates must have a different
number than the first set of plates issued to the same applicant.
Special license plates issued pursuant to this section may only be
used on a private passenger vehicle, a noncommercial truck or a
motor home.
5. The Department shall issue specially designed license
plates for any person qualified pursuant to this section who
submits:
(a) An application on a form prescribed by the Department;
(b) Documentation which, in the determination of the
Department, demonstrates that the applicant:
-
*SB148*

– 4 –
(1) Served on a military unit that was awarded the
Presidential Unit Citation; and
(2) Was assigned to the unit at the time of the action for
which the Presidential Unit Citation was awarded; and
(c) If applicable, and subject to the provisions of NRS
417.0187, evidence of his or her disability as required by the
Department.
6. A vehicle on which special license plates issued by the
Department pursuant to subsection 3 are displayed is exempt from
the payment of any parking fees, including, without limitation,
those collected through parking meters, charged by the State or
any political subdivision or other public body within this State,
other than the United States.
7. If, during a registration year, the holder of a set of special
license plates issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
disposes of the vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder
shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle which
meets the requirements of this section and report the change to the
Department in accordance with the procedure set forth for other
transfers; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
8. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no fee in
addition to the applicable registration and license fees and
governmental services taxes may be charged for the issuance or
renewal of a set of special license plates pursuant to this section. If
the special license plates issued pursuant to this section are lost,
stolen or mutilated, the owner of the vehicle may secure a set of
duplicate number of plates from the Department for the fees
required pursuant to NRS 482.268.
9. A person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant
to this section may request that the personalized prestige license
plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 be combined with license
plates that indicate that the person has served on a unit of the
Armed Forces of the United States which has been awarded the
Presidential Unit Citation if the person pays the fees prescribed by
NRS 482.367 for the personalized prestige license plates.
10. The provisions of NRS 482.36705 do not apply to license
plates described in this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 482.216 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.216 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155,
upon the request of a new vehicle dealer, the Department may
authorize the new vehicle dealer to:
-
*SB148*

– 5 –
(a) Accept applications for the registration of the new motor
vehicles he or she sells and the related fees and taxes;
(b) Issue certificates of registration to applicants who satisfy the
requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Accept applications for the transfer of registration pursuant
to NRS 482.399 if the applicant purchased from the new vehicle
dealer a new vehicle to which the registration is to be transferred.
2. A new vehicle dealer who is authorized to issue certificates
of registration pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Transmit the applications received to the Department within
the period prescribed by the Department;
(b) Transmit the fees collected from the applicants and properly
account for them within the period prescribed by the Department;
(c) Comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
5; and
(d) Bear any cost of equipment which is necessary to issue
certificates of registration, including any computer hardware or
software.
3. A new vehicle dealer who is authorized to issue certificates
of registration pursuant to subsection 1 shall not:
(a) Charge any additional fee for the performance of those
services;
(b) Receive compensation from the Department for the
performance of those services;
(c) Accept applications for the renewal of registration of a motor
vehicle; or
(d) Accept an application for the registration of a motor vehicle
if the applicant wishes to:
(1) Obtain special license plates pursuant to NRS 482.3667
to 482.3823, inclusive [;] , and section 1 of this act; or
(2) Claim the exemption from the governmental services tax
provided pursuant to NRS 361.1565 to veterans and their relations.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to the registration
of a moped pursuant to NRS 482.2155.
5. The Director shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section. The regulations adopted
pursuant to this subsection must provide for:
(a) The expedient and secure issuance of license plates and
decals by the Department; and
(b) The withdrawal of the authority granted to a new vehicle
dealer pursuant to subsection 1 if that dealer fails to comply with the
regulations adopted by the Department.
-
*SB148*

– 6 –
Sec. 3. NRS 482.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.270 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section or by
specific statute, the Director shall order the redesign and preparation
of motor vehicle license plates.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department may, upon the payment of all applicable fees, issue
redesigned motor vehicle license plates.
3. The Department shall not issue redesigned motor vehicle
license plates pursuant to this section to a person who was issued
motor vehicle license plates before January 1, 1982, or pursuant to
NRS 482.2155, 482.3747, 482.3763, 482.3783, 482.379 or
482.37901, or section 1 of this act without the approval of the
person.
4. The Director may determine and vary the size, shape and
form and the material of which license plates are made, but each
license plate must be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from a
distance of 100 feet during daylight. All license plates must be
treated to reflect light and to be at least 100 times brighter than
conventional painted number plates. When properly mounted on an
unlighted vehicle, the license plates, when viewed from a vehicle
equipped with standard headlights, must be visible for a distance of
not less than 1,500 feet and readable for a distance of not less than
110 feet.
5. Every license plate must have displayed upon it:
(a) The registration number, or combination of letters and
numbers, assigned to the vehicle and to the owner thereof;
(b) The name of this State, which may be abbreviated;
(c) If issued for a calendar year, the year; and
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085, if issued for
a registration period other than a calendar year, the month and year
the registration expires.
Sec. 4. NRS 482.2703 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2703 1. The Director may order the preparation of
sample license plates which must be of the same design and size as
regular license plates or license plates issued pursuant to NRS
482.384. The Director shall ensure that:
(a) Each license plate issued pursuant to this subsection,
regardless of its design, is inscribed with the word SAMPLE and an
identical designation which consists of the same group of three
numerals followed by the same group of three letters; and
(b) The designation of numerals and letters assigned pursuant to
paragraph (a) is not assigned to a vehicle registered pursuant to this
chapter or chapter 706 of NRS.
2. The Director may order the preparation of sample license
plates which must be of the same design and size as any of the
-
*SB148*

– 7 –
special license plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to 482.3823,
inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act. The Director shall ensure
that:
(a) Each license plate issued pursuant to this subsection,
regardless of its design, is inscribed with the word SAMPLE and the
number zero in the location where any other numerals would
normally be displayed on a license plate of that design; and
(b) The number assigned pursuant to paragraph (a) is not
assigned to a vehicle registered pursuant to this chapter or chapter
706 of NRS.
3. The Director may establish a fee for the issuance of sample
license plates of not more than $15 for each license plate.
4. A decal issued pursuant to NRS 482.271 may be displayed
on a sample license plate issued pursuant to this section.
5. All money collected from the issuance of sample license
plates must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the
Motor Vehicle Fund.
6. A person shall not affix a sample license plate issued
pursuant to this section to a vehicle. A person who violates the
provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. NRS 482.274 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.274 1. The Director shall order the preparation of vehicle
license plates for trailers in the same manner provided for motor
vehicles in NRS 482.270, except that a vehicle license plate
prepared for a full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 is not required to have displayed upon
it the month and year the registration expires.
2. The Director shall order preparation of two sizes of vehicle
license plates for trailers. The smaller plates may be used for trailers
with a gross vehicle weight of less than 1,000 pounds.
3. The Director shall determine the registration numbers
assigned to trailers.
4. Any license plates issued for a trailer before July 1, 1975,
bearing a different designation from that provided for in this section,
are valid during the period for which such plates were issued.
5. The Department shall not issue for a full trailer or semitrailer
that is registered pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 a special
license plate available pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to 482.3823,
inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 482.367002 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.367002 1. A person may request that the Department
design, prepare and issue a special license plate by submitting an
application to the Department. A person may submit an application
-
*SB148*

– 8 –
for a special license plate that is intended to generate financial
support for an organization only if:
(a) For an organization which is not a governmental entity, the
organization is established as a nonprofit charitable organization
which provides services to the community relating to public health,
education or general welfare;
(b) For an organization which is a governmental entity, the
organization only uses the financial support generated by the special
license plate for charitable purposes relating to public health,
education or general welfare;
(c) The organization is registered with the Secretary of State, if
registration is required by law, and has filed any documents required
to remain registered with the Secretary of State;
(d) The name and purpose of the organization do not promote,
advertise or endorse any specific product, brand name or service that
is offered for profit;
(e) The organization is nondiscriminatory; and
(f) The license plate will not promote a specific religion, faith or
antireligious belief.
2. An application submitted to the Department pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Must be on a form prescribed and furnished by the
Department;
(b) Must specify whether the special license plate being
requested is intended to generate financial support for a particular
cause or charitable organization and, if so:
(1) The name of the cause or charitable organization; and
(2) Whether the financial support intended to be generated
for the particular cause or charitable organization will be for:
(I) General use by the particular cause or charitable
organization; or
(II) Use by the particular cause or charitable organization
in a more limited or specific manner;
(c) Must include the name and signature of a person who
represents:
(1) The organization which is requesting that the Department
design, prepare and issue the special license plate; and
(2) If different from the organization described in
subparagraph (1), the cause or charitable organization for which the
special license plate being requested is intended to generate
financial support;
(d) Must include proof that the organization satisfies the
requirements set forth in subsection 1;
(e) Must be accompanied by a surety bond posted with the
Department in the amount of $5,000, except that if the special
-
*SB148*

– 9 –
license plate being requested is one of the type described in
subsection 3 of NRS 482.367008, the application must be
accompanied by a surety bond posted with the Department in the
amount of $20,000;
(f) Must, if the organization is a charitable organization, not
including a governmental entity whose budget is included in the
executive budget, include a budget prepared by or for the charitable
organization which includes, without limitation, the proposed
operating and administrative expenses of the charitable
organization; and
(g) Must be accompanied by suggestions for the design of and
colors to be used in the special license plate. The suggestion must be
made in consultation with the charitable organization for which the
special license plate is intended to generate financial support, if any.
3. If an application for a special license plate has been
submitted pursuant to this section but the Department has not yet
designed, prepared or issued the plate, the applicant shall amend the
application with updated information when any of the following
events take place:
(a) The name of the organization that submitted the application
has changed since the initial application was submitted.
(b) The cause or charitable organization for which the special
license plate being requested is intended to generate financial
support has a different name than that set forth on the initial
application.
(c) The cause or charitable organization for which the special
license plate being requested is intended to generate financial
support is different from that set forth on the initial application.
(d) A charitable organization which submitted a budget pursuant
to paragraph (f) of subsection 2 prepares or has prepared a new or
subsequent budget.
 The updated information described in this subsection must be
submitted to the Department within 90 days after the relevant
change takes place, unless the applicant has received notice that the
special license plate is on an agenda to be heard at a public meeting
of the Department held pursuant to subsection 4, in which case the
updated information must be submitted to the Department within 48
hours after the applicant receives such notice. The updating of
information pursuant to this subsection does not alter, change or
otherwise affect the issuance of special license plates by the
Department in accordance with the chronological order of their
authorization or approval, as described in subsection 2 of
NRS 482.367008.
4. The Department shall hold a public meeting before
determining whether to approve or disapprove:
-
*SB148*

– 10 –
(a) An application for the design, preparation and issuance of a
special license plate that is submitted to the Department pursuant to
subsection 1; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, an application
for the design, preparation and issuance of a special license plate
that has been authorized by an act of the Legislature after January 1,
2007.
 In determining whether to approve such an application, the
Department shall consider, without limitation, whether it would be
appropriate and feasible for the Department to design, prepare and
issue the particular special license plate. The Department shall
consider each application in the chronological order in which the
application was received by the Department.
5. Before holding a public meeting pursuant to subsection 4,
the Department shall:
(a) At least 30 days before the public meeting is held, notify:
(1) The person who requested the special license plate
pursuant to subsection 1; and
(2) The charitable organization for which the special license
plate is intended to generate financial support, if any; and
(b) Post a notice of the public meeting that complies with
chapter 241 of NRS.
6. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 4 do not apply
with regard to special license plates that are issued pursuant to NRS
482.3746, 482.3751, 482.3752, 482.3757, 482.3783, 482.3785,
482.3787, 482.37901, 482.37902, 482.37906, 482.37907, 482.3791,
482.3794 or 482.3817 [.] or section 1 of this act.
7. The Department may design and prepare a special license
plate requested pursuant to subsection 1 if the Department:
(a) Determines that the application for that plate complies with
subsection 2; and
(b) Approves the application for that plate after holding the
public meeting required pursuant to subsection 4.
8. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.367008, the
Department may issue a special license plate that:
(a) The Department has designed and prepared pursuant to
subsection 7; and
(b) Complies with the requirements of NRS 482.367003,
 for any motorcycle, passenger car or light commercial vehicle
upon application by a person who is entitled to license plates
pursuant to NRS 482.265 and who otherwise complies with the
requirements for registration and licensing pursuant to this chapter.
A person may request that personalized prestige license plates
issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 be combined with a special
license plate issued pursuant to this section if that person pays the
-
*SB148*

– 11 –
fees for personalized prestige license plates in addition to the fees
for the special license plate.
9. Upon making a determination to issue a special license plate
pursuant to subsection 8, the Department shall notify:
(a) The person who requested the special license plate pursuant
to subsection 1; and
(b) The charitable organization for which the special license
plate is intended to generate financial support, if any.
10. After making a determination to issue a special license
plate pursuant to this section, if the Department determines not to
use the design or colors suggested pursuant to paragraph (g) of
subsection 2, the Department shall notify the person who requested
the special license plate pursuant to subsection 1. The notice must
include, without limitation, the reasons the Department did not use
the design or colors suggested pursuant to paragraph (g) of
subsection 2.
11. Within 180 days after receiving the notice pursuant to
subsection 10, the person who requested the special license plate
pursuant to subsection 1 shall, in consultation with the charitable
organization for which the special license plate is intended to
generate financial support, if any, submit a revised suggestion for
the design of and colors to be used in the special license plate. If the
person does not submit a revised suggestion within 180 days after
receiving the notice pursuant to subsection 10, the Department must:
(a) Not issue the special license plate; and
(b) Notify:
(1) The person who requested the special license plate
pursuant to subsection 1; and
(2) The charitable organization for which the special license
plate is intended to generate financial support, if any.
12. After receiving the suggested design of and colors to be
used in the special license plate pursuant to paragraph (g) of
subsection 2 or subsection 11 and upon determining the design of
and the colors to be used in the special license plate, the Department
shall submit the design of and the colors to be used in the special
license plate to the person who requested the special license plate
pursuant to subsection 1 and to the charitable organization for which
the special license plate is intended to generate financial support, if
any. The person and the charitable organization, if any, shall
respond to the Department within 30 days after receiving the design
of and the colors to be used in the special license plate and shall:
(a) Approve the design of and the colors to be used in the
special license plate; or
(b) Submit suggestions to revise the design of or colors to be
used in the special license plate.
-
*SB148*

– 12 –
 If the person who requested the special license plate pursuant to
subsection 1 and the charitable organization for which the special
license plate is intended to generate financial support, if any, fail to
respond within 30 days after receiving the design of and the colors
to be used in the special license plate, the person and charitable
organization shall be deemed to approve the design of and the colors
to be used in the special license plate. The Department may adopt
regulations to carry out this subsection.
13. The Department must promptly release the surety bond
posted pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) If the Department determines not to issue the special license
plate;
(b) If the Department distributes the additional fees collected on
behalf of a charitable organization to another charitable organization
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subsection 5 of
NRS 482.38279 and the surety bond has not been released to the
initial charitable organization; or
(c) If it is determined that at least 1,000 special license plates
have been issued pursuant to the assessment of the viability of the
design of the special license plate conducted pursuant to NRS
482.367008, except that if the special license plate is one of the type
described in subsection 3 of NRS 482.367008, the Department must
promptly release the surety bond posted pursuant to subsection 2 if
it is determined that at least 3,000 special license plates have been
issued pursuant to the assessment of the viability of the design of the
special license plate conducted pursuant to NRS 482.367008.
14. If, during a registration period, the holder of license plates
issued pursuant to the provisions of this section disposes of the
vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle that meets
the requirements of this section if the holder pays the fee for the
transfer of the registration and any registration fee or governmental
services tax due pursuant to NRS 482.399; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
15. On or before September 1 of each fiscal year, the
Department shall compile a list of each special license plate the
Department, during the immediately preceding fiscal year, designed
and prepared pursuant to subsection 7 or issued pursuant to
subsection 8. The list must set forth, for each such plate, the cause
or charitable organization for which the special license plate
generates or would generate financial support, and the intended use
to which the financial support is being put or would be put. The
Department shall make that information available on its Internet
website.
-
*SB148*

– 13 –
16. On or before January 31 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report that contains information detailing:
(1) The requests submitted pursuant to subsection 1;
(2) The list compiled pursuant to subsection 15 for the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(3) Any special license plates that the Department will no
longer issue pursuant to NRS 482.367008;
(4) The results of any activities conducted pursuant to NRS
482.38272 to 482.38279, inclusive; and
(5) Any actions taken by the Department pursuant to
subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 482.38279; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, if the Legislature is in
session, or to the Legislative Commission, if the Legislature is not
in session.
Sec. 7. NRS 482.367008 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.367008 1. As used in this section, “special license plate”
means:
(a) A license plate that the Department has designed and
prepared pursuant to NRS 482.367002 in accordance with the
system of application described in that section;
(b) A license plate approved by the Legislature that the
Department has designed and prepared pursuant to NRS 482.3747,
482.37903, 482.37917, 482.379175, 482.37918, 482.37919,
482.3792, 482.3793, 482.37933, 482.37934, 482.37935,
482.379355, 482.379365, 482.37937, 482.379375, 482.37938,
482.37939, 482.37945 or 482.37947; and
(c) Except for a license plate that is issued pursuant to NRS
482.3746, 482.3751, 482.3752, 482.3757, 482.3783, 482.3785,
482.3787, 482.37901, 482.37902, 482.37906, 482.37907, 482.3791,
482.3794, 482.37941 or 482.3817, or section 1 of this act, a license
plate that is approved by the Legislature after July 1, 2005.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
and except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the Department
shall not, at any one time, issue more than 30 separate designs of
special license plates. Whenever the total number of separate
designs of special license plates issued by the Department at any one
time is less than 30, the Department shall issue a number of
additional designs of special license plates that have been authorized
by an act of the Legislature or the application for which has been
approved by the Department pursuant to NRS 482.367002, not to
exceed a total of 30 designs issued by the Department at any one
time. Such additional designs must be issued by the Department in
-
*SB148*

– 14 –
accordance with the chronological order of their authorization or
approval by the Department.
3. In addition to the special license plates described in
subsection 2, the Department may issue not more than five separate
designs of special license plates in excess of the limit set forth in
that subsection. To qualify for issuance pursuant to this subsection:
(a) The Department must approve the design, preparation and
issuance of the special plates as described in NRS 482.367002; and
(b) The special license plates must have been applied for,
designed, prepared and issued pursuant to NRS 482.367002, except
that:
(1) The application for the special license plates must be
accompanied by a surety bond posted with the Department in the
amount of $20,000; and
(2) Pursuant to the assessment of the viability of the design
of the special license plates that is conducted pursuant to this
section, it is determined that at least 3,000 special license plates
have been issued.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, on
October 1 of each year the Department shall assess the viability of
each separate design of special license plate that the Department is
currently issuing by determining the total number of validly
registered motor vehicles to which that design of special license
plate is affixed. The Department shall not determine the total
number of validly registered motor vehicles to which a particular
design of special license plate is affixed if:
(a) The particular design of special license plate was designed
and prepared by the Department pursuant to NRS 482.367002; and
(b) On October 1, that particular design of special license plate
has been available to be issued for less than 12 months.
5. If, on October 1, the total number of validly registered motor
vehicles to which a particular design of special license plate is
affixed is:
(a) In the case of special license plates not described in
subsection 3, less than 1,000; or
(b) In the case of special license plates described in subsection
3, less than 3,000,
 the Director shall provide notice of that fact in the manner
described in subsection 6.
6. The notice required pursuant to subsection 5 must be
provided:
(a) If the special license plate generates financial support for a
cause or charitable organization, to that cause or charitable
organization.
-
*SB148*

– 15 –
(b) If the special license plate does not generate financial
support for a cause or charitable organization, to an entity which is
involved in promoting the activity, place or other matter that is
depicted on the plate.
7. If, on December 31 of the same year in which notice was
provided pursuant to subsections 5 and 6, the total number of validly
registered motor vehicles to which a particular design of special
license plate is affixed is:
(a) In the case of special license plates not described in
subsection 3, less than 1,000; or
(b) In the case of special license plates described in subsection
3, less than 3,000,
 the Director shall, notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, issue an order providing that the Department will no
longer issue that particular design of special license plate. Such an
order does not require existing holders of that particular design of
special license plate to surrender their plates to the Department and
does not prohibit those holders from renewing those plates.
Sec. 8. NRS 482.36705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.36705 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) If a new special license plate is authorized by an act of the
Legislature after January 1, 2003, other than a special license plate
that is authorized pursuant to NRS 482.379375, the Legislature will
direct that the license plate not be designed, prepared or issued by
the Department unless the Department receives at least 1,000
applications for the issuance of that plate within 2 years after the
effective date of the act of the Legislature that authorized the plate.
(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraph (a), if a
new special license plate is authorized by an act of the Legislature
after July 1, 2005, the Legislature will direct that the license plate
not be issued by the Department unless its issuance complies with
subsection 2 of NRS 482.367008.
(c) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraphs (a) and
(b), if a new special license plate is authorized by an act of the
Legislature after January 1, 2007, the Legislature will direct that the
license plate not be designed, prepared or issued by the Department
unless the Department approves the application for the authorized
plate pursuant to NRS 482.367002.
(d) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraphs (a),
(b) and (c), if a new special license plate is authorized by an act of
the Legislature after July 1, 2021, the Legislature will direct that the
license plate not be designed, prepared or issued by the Department
unless the organization meeting the requirements described in
subsection 1 of NRS 482.367002 submits suggestions for the design
of and colors to be used in the special license plate within 180 days
-
*SB148*

– 16 –
after the authorization of the special license plate. The provisions of
subsections 10, 11 and 12 of NRS 482.367002 apply to suggestions
submitted pursuant to this paragraph.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply with regard to
special license plates that are issued pursuant to NRS 482.3746,
482.3751, 482.3752, 482.3757, 482.3783, 482.3785, 482.3787,
482.37901, 482.37902, 482.37906, 482.37907, 482.3791, 482.3794,
482.37941 or 482.3817 [.] or section 1 of this act.
Sec. 9. NRS 482.38276 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.38276 “Special license plate” means:
1. A license plate that the Department has designed and
prepared pursuant to NRS 482.367002 in accordance with the
system of application and petition described in that section;
2. A license plate approved by the Legislature that the
Department has designed and prepared pursuant to NRS 482.3747,
482.37903, 482.37904, 482.37905, 482.37907, 482.37917,
482.379175, 482.37918, 482.37919, 482.3792, 482.3793,
482.37933, 482.37934, 482.37935, 482.379355, 482.379365,
482.37937, 482.379375, 482.37938, 482.37939, 482.37945 or
482.37947; and
3. Except for a license plate that is issued pursuant to NRS
482.3746, 482.3757, 482.3785, 482.3787, 482.37901, 482.37902,
482.37906, 482.3791, 482.3794 or 482.37941, or section 1 of this
act, a license plate that is approved by the Legislature after July 1,
2005.
Sec. 10. NRS 482.399 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.399 1. Upon the transfer of the ownership of or interest
in any vehicle by any holder of a valid registration, or upon
destruction of the vehicle, the registration expires.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, the holder of the original registration
may transfer the registration to another vehicle to be registered by
the holder and use the same regular license plate or plates or special
license plate or plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to
482.3823, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, or 482.384, on the
vehicle from which the registration is being transferred, if the
license plate or plates are appropriate for the second vehicle, upon
filing an application for transfer of registration and upon paying the
transfer registration fee and the excess, if any, of the registration fee
and governmental services tax on the vehicle to which the
registration is transferred over the total registration fee and
governmental services tax paid on all vehicles from which he or she
is transferring ownership or interest. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 482.294, an application for transfer of registration must be
made in person, if practicable, to any office or agent of the
-
*SB148*

– 17 –
Department or to a registered dealer, and the license plate or plates
may not be used upon a second vehicle until registration of that
vehicle is complete.
3. In computing the governmental services tax, the
Department, its agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion
of the tax paid on the first vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the second vehicle or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner. If any person
transfers ownership or interest in two or more vehicles, the
Department or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the tax
paid on all of the vehicles attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred or on any other vehicle of which the person is the
registered owner. The certificates of registration and unused license
plates of the vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest must be submitted before credit is given against the tax due
on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner.
4. In computing the registration fee, the Department or its
agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the
registration fee paid on each vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis
against the registration fee due on the vehicle to which registration
is transferred.
5. If the amount owed on the registration fee or governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which registration is transferred is less
than the credit on the total registration fee or governmental services
tax paid on all vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest, the person may apply the unused portion of the credit to the
registration of any other vehicle owned by the person. Any unused
portion of such a credit expires on the date the registration of the
vehicle from which the person transferred the registration was due
to expire.
6. If the license plate or plates are not appropriate for the
second vehicle, the plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department or registered dealer and an appropriate plate or plates
must be issued by the Department. The Department shall not reissue
the surrendered plate or plates until the next succeeding licensing
period.
7. If application for transfer of registration is not made within
60 days after the destruction or transfer of ownership of or interest
in any vehicle, the license plate or plates must be surrendered to the
-
*SB148*

– 18 –
Department on or before the 60th day for cancellation of the
registration.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
371.040, NRS 482.2155, subsections 8 and 9 of NRS 482.260 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, if a person cancels his or her
registration and surrenders to the Department the license plates for a
vehicle, the Department shall:
(a) In accordance with the provisions of subsection 9, issue to
the person a refund of the portion of the registration fee and
governmental services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the
remainder of the current calendar year or registration period on a pro
rata basis; or
(b) If the person does not qualify for a refund in accordance with
the provisions of subsection 9, issue to the person a credit in the
amount of the portion of the registration fee and governmental
services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the remainder of the
current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis. Such
a credit may be applied by the person to the registration of any other
vehicle owned by the person. Any unused portion of the credit
expires on the date the registration of the vehicle from which the
person obtained a refund was due to expire.
9. The Department shall issue a refund pursuant to subsection 8
only if the request for a refund is made at the time the registration is
cancelled and the license plates are surrendered, the person
requesting the refund is a resident of Nevada, the amount eligible
for refund exceeds $100, and evidence satisfactory to the
Department is submitted that reasonably proves the existence of
extenuating circumstances. For the purposes of this subsection, the
term “extenuating circumstances” means circumstances wherein:
(a) The person has recently relinquished his or her driver’s
license and has sold or otherwise disposed of his or her vehicle.
(b) The vehicle has been determined to be inoperable and the
person does not transfer the registration to a different vehicle.
(c) The owner of the vehicle is seriously ill or has died and the
guardians or survivors have sold or otherwise disposed of the
vehicle.
(d) Any other event occurs which the Department, by regulation,
has defined to constitute an “extenuating circumstance” for the
purposes of this subsection.
Sec. 11. NRS 484B.463 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.463 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, an
owner or operator of a motor vehicle displaying a special parking
placard, a special parking sticker, a temporary parking placard, a
temporary parking sticker or a special plate or plates issued pursuant
to NRS 482.384, or a special plate or plates for a veteran with a
-
*SB148*

– 19 –
disability issued pursuant to NRS 482.3765, 482.377, 482.3775,
482.378 or 482.3783, or section 1 of this act may park the motor
vehicle for not more than 4 hours at any one time in a parking zone
restricted as to the length of time parking is permitted, without
penalty, removal or impoundment of the vehicle if the parking is
otherwise consistent with public safety and is done by a person with
a permanent disability, disability of moderate duration or temporary
disability, a veteran with a disability or a person transporting any
such person.
2. An owner or operator of a motor vehicle displaying a special
plate or plates for a veteran with a disability issued pursuant to NRS
482.3765, 482.377, 482.3775, 482.378 or 482.3783 or section 1 of
this act may, without displaying a special license plate, placard or
sticker issued pursuant to NRS 482.384, park in a parking space
designated for persons who are handicapped if:
(a) The parking is done by a veteran with a disability; or
(b) A veteran with a disability is a passenger in the motor
vehicle being parked.
3. This section does not authorize the parking of a motor
vehicle in any privately or municipally owned facility for parking
off the highway without paying the required fee for the time during
which the vehicle is so parked.
Sec. 12. NRS 484B.467 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.467 1. Any parking space designated for persons who
are handicapped must be indicated by a sign:
(a) Bearing the international symbol of access with or without
the words “Parking,” “Handicapped Parking,” “Handicapped
Parking Only” or “Reserved for the Handicapped,” or any other
word or combination of words indicating that the space is
designated for persons who are handicapped;
(b) Stating “Minimum fine of $250 for use by others” or
equivalent words; and
(c) The bottom of which must be not less than 4 feet above the
ground.
2. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, a parking
space designated for persons who are handicapped which:
(a) Is designed for the exclusive use of a vehicle with a side-
loading wheelchair lift; and
(b) Is located in a parking lot with 60 or more parking spaces,
 must be indicated by a sign using a combination of words to state
that the space is for the exclusive use of a vehicle with a side-
loading wheelchair lift.
3. If a parking space is designed for the use of a vehicle with a
side-loading wheelchair lift, the space which is immediately
-
*SB148*

– 20 –
adjacent and intended for use in the loading and unloading of a
wheelchair into or out of such a vehicle must be indicated by a sign:
(a) Stating “No Parking” or similar words which indicate that
parking in such a space is prohibited;
(b) Stating “Minimum fine of $250 for violation” or similar
words indicating that the minimum fine for parking in such a space
is $250; and
(c) The bottom of which must not be less than 4 feet above the
ground.
4. An owner of private property upon which is located a
parking space described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 shall erect and
maintain or cause to be erected and maintained any sign required
pursuant to subsection 1, 2 or 3, whichever is applicable. If a
parking space described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 is located on public
property, the governmental entity having control over that public
property shall erect and maintain or cause to be erected and
maintained any sign required pursuant to subsection 1, 2 or 3,
whichever is applicable.
5. A person shall not park a vehicle in a space designated for
persons who are handicapped by a sign that meets the requirements
of subsection 1, whether on public or privately owned property,
unless the person is eligible to do so and the vehicle displays:
(a) A special license plate or plates issued pursuant to
NRS 482.384;
(b) A special or temporary parking placard issued pursuant to
NRS 482.384;
(c) A special or temporary parking sticker issued pursuant to
NRS 482.384;
(d) A special license plate or plates, a special or temporary
parking sticker, or a special or temporary parking placard displaying
the international symbol of access issued by another state or a
foreign country; or
(e) A special license plate or plates for a veteran with a
disability issued pursuant to NRS 482.3765, 482.377, 482.3775,
482.378 or 482.3783 [.] or section 1 of this act.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
shall not park a vehicle in a space that is reserved for the exclusive
use of a vehicle with a side-loading wheelchair lift and is designated
for persons who are handicapped by a sign that meets the
requirements of subsection 2, whether on public or privately owned
property, unless:
(a) The person is eligible to do so;
(b) The vehicle displays the special license plate, plates or
placard set forth in subsection 5; and
(c) The vehicle is equipped with a side-loading wheelchair lift.
-
*SB148*

– 21 –
 A person who meets the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b)
may park a vehicle that is not equipped with a side-loading
wheelchair lift in such a parking space if the space is in a parking lot
with fewer than 60 parking spaces.
7. A person shall not park in a space which:
(a) Is immediately adjacent to a space designed for use by a
vehicle with a side-loading wheelchair lift; and
(b) Is designated as a space in which parking is prohibited by a
sign that meets the requirements of subsection 3,
 whether on public or privately owned property.
8. A person shall not use a plate, sticker or placard set forth in
subsection 5 to park in a space designated for persons who are
handicapped unless he or she is a person with a permanent
disability, disability of moderate duration or temporary disability, a
veteran with a disability or the driver of a vehicle in which any such
person is a passenger.
9. A person with a permanent disability, disability of moderate
duration or temporary disability to whom a:
(a) Special license plate, or a special or temporary parking
sticker, has been issued pursuant to NRS 482.384 shall not allow
any other person to park the vehicle, motorcycle or moped
displaying the special license plate or special or temporary parking
sticker in a space designated for persons who are handicapped
unless the person with the permanent disability, disability of
moderate duration or temporary disability is a passenger in the
vehicle or on the motorcycle or moped, or is being picked up or
dropped off by the driver of the vehicle, motorcycle or moped, at the
time that the vehicle, motorcycle or moped is parked in the space
designated for persons who are handicapped.
(b) Special or temporary parking placard has been issued
pursuant to NRS 482.384 shall not allow any other person to park
the vehicle which displays the special or temporary parking placard
in a space designated for persons who are handicapped unless the
person with the permanent disability, disability of moderate duration
or temporary disability is a passenger in the vehicle, or is being
picked up or dropped off by the driver of the vehicle, at the time that
it is parked in the space designated for persons who are
handicapped.
10. A person who violates any of the provisions of subsections
5 to 9, inclusive, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished:
(a) Upon the first offense, by a fine of $250.
(b) Upon the second offense, by a fine of $250 and not less than
8 hours, but not more than 50 hours, of community service.
-
*SB148*

– 22 –
(c) Upon the third or subsequent offense, by a fine of not less
than $500, but not more than $1,000 and not less than 25 hours, but
not more than 100 hours, of community service.
H
-
*SB148*